District of Columbia statutes.
8-2131.08

Penalties.

A violation of this chapter or the rules issued under authority of this chapter shall be a civil infraction for the purposes of Chapter 18 of Title 2. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or the rules issued under authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-163, § 9, 51 DCR 3683